Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle B. Designation of Trustee and Governing Law.

§ 81-27-3.101.
Designation of trustee.

Any person residing in this state may designate any trust institution to act as a fiduciary on behalf of such person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-3.102.
Choice of law governing trusts.

Any trust institution that maintains a trust office or representative trust office in this state and its affected clients may designate either (i) this state, (ii) a state where affected clients reside or (iii) the state where such trust institution has its principal office as the state whose laws shall govern any written agreement between such trust institution and its client or any instrument under which the trust institution acts for a client.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-3.103.
Choice of law governing fiduciary investments.

Any trust institution that maintains a trust office or representative trust office in this state and its affected clients may designate either (i) this state, (ii) a state where affected clients reside or (iii) the state where such trust institution has its principal office as the state whose laws shall govern with respect to the fiduciary investment standards applicable to any written agreement between such trust institution or its client and any other instrument under which the trust institution acts for a client.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.